Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB549.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 702(b)(2) and 802(a)(1.1) of the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, are amended to read:Section 702. Grower/processors.* * *(b) Limitations.--* * *123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (2) For the [purpose] purposes of paragraph (1), a grower/processor shall maintain continuous video surveillance equipment in continuous operation. A grower/processor is required to retain the recordings onsite or offsite for a period of no less than 180 days, unless otherwise required for investigative or litigation purposes.* * *Section 802. Facility requirements.(a) General rule.--* * *(1.1) For the purposes of paragraph (1), a dispensary shall maintain continuous video surveillance equipment in continuous operation. The dispensary is required to retain the recordings onsite or offsite for a period of no less than 180 days, unless otherwise required for investigative or litigation purposes.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0549PN0550 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718